District of Columbia statutes.
2-220.07

Records.

All recipients and subcontractors shall retain payroll records created and maintained in the regular course of business under District of Columbia law for a period of at least 3 years from the payroll date for employees subject to § 2-220.03.

June 8, 2006, D.C. Law 16-118, § 107, 53 DCR 2602

History

This section is referenced in § 2-220.04 and § 2-220.06.

Section References